Maryland, session 2025, HB1192.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1192*

HOUSE BILL 1192
2–120.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “DIRECTOR” MEANS THE DIRECTOR OF THE STATE DEPARTMENT
OF ASSESSMENTS AND TAXATION.
(3) “MATERIAL SUPPORT OR RESOURCES” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN 18 U.S.C. 2339A.
(4) “NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION” MEANS A BUSINESS ENTITY THAT:
(I) IS EXEMPT FROM FEDERAL INCOME TAXES UNDER § 501 OF
THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE; AND
(II) HAS BEEN GRANTED:
1. AN INCOME TAX EXEMPTION UNDER § 10–104 OF THIS
ARTICLE;
2. A SALES AND USE TAX EXEMPTION UNDER § 11–204 OF
THIS ARTICLE; OR
3. A PROPERTY TAX EXEMPTION UNDER § 7–202 OR §
7–204 OF THE TAX – PROPERTY ARTICLE.
(5) “TERRORIST–SUPPORTING ORGANIZATION” MEANS A NONPROFIT
ORGANIZATION OR AN AGENT OF THE NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION THAT HAS BEEN
FOUND BY A FEDERAL AGENCY TO BE IN VIOLATION OF 18 U.S.C. § 2339A OR §
2339B FOR PROVIDING MATERIAL SUPPORT OR RESOURCES TO AN ORGANIZATION
DESIGNATED AS A TERRORIST ORGANIZATION BY THE U.S. SECRETARY OF STATE
OR UNDER § 501(P) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE.
(B) THE COMPTROLLER AND DIRECTOR JOINTLY SHALL, AS PRACTICABLE,
DETERMINE ON A REGULAR BASIS WHETHER ANY NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION IN THE
STATE HAS BEEN FOUND TO BE A TERRORIST–SUPPORTING ORGANIZATION.
(C) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTIONS (D) THROUGH (F) OF THIS SECTION, IF THE
COMPTROLLER AND DIRECTOR DETERMINE THAT A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION IN
THE STATE HAS BEEN FOUND TO BE A TERRORIST–SUPPORTING ORGANIZATION IN
ANY OF THE 3 IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING TAXABLE YEARS, THE COMPTROLLER
SHALL RESCIND THE NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION’S TAX–EXEMPT STATUS WITH

HOUSE BILL 1192 3
RESPECT TO THE INCOME TAX AND SALES AND USE TAX IMPOSED UNDER THIS
ARTICLE.
(D) (1) BEFORE RESCINDING A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION’S
TAX–EXEMPT STATUS UNDER THIS SECTION, THE COMPTROLLER SHALL SEND
NOTICE OF THE RESCISSION BY REGISTERED MAIL TO:
(I) THE NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION’S ADDRESS OF
REGISTRATION IN THE STATE; AND
(II) IF APPLICABLE, THE ADDRESS ON THE MOST RECENTLY
FILED INCOME TAX RETURN FOR THE NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION.
(2) THE NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL INCLUDE
ANY INFORMATION ON WHICH THE COMPTROLLER RELIED WHEN DECIDING TO
RESCIND THE NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION’S TAX–EXEMPT STATUS.
(E) (1) A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION THAT RECEIVES A NOTICE OF
RESCISSION UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION SHALL HAVE 90 CALENDAR
DAYS FROM THE DATE THE LAST NOTICE IS MAILED TO PROVIDE ANY INFORMATION
AS MAY BE REQUIRED BY THE COMPTROLLER TO PREVENT THE RESCISSION.
(2) THE COMPTROLLER MAY WITHDRAW THE DECISION TO RESCIND
BASED ON THE INFORMATION PROVIDED BY THE NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(F) (1) AFTER THE 90 DAYS UNDER SUBSECTION (E)(1) OF THIS SECTION
LAPSE, THE RESCISSION SHALL BECOME EFFECTIVE UNLESS THE COMPTROLLER
WITHDRAWS THE DECISION TO RESCIND IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (E)(2)
OF THIS SECTION.
(2) THE COMPTROLLER SHALL PROMPTLY NOTIFY THE DIRECTOR
WHEN ANY RESCISSION AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS SECTION BECOMES EFFECTIVE.
(3) THE COMPTROLLER MAY REINSTATE A NONPROFIT
ORGANIZATION’S TAX–EXEMPT STATUS THAT HAS BEEN RESCINDED UNDER THIS
SECTION ONLY IF:
(I) THE COMPTROLLER DETERMINES THE RESCISSION WAS
ERRONEOUS;

HOUSE BILL 1192
(II) THE COMPTROLLER RECEIVES ATTESTATION FROM THE
NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION UNDER PENALTY OF PERJURY THAT IT DID NOT
RECEIVE THE NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION; OR
(III) BASED ON ANY OTHER NEWLY AVAILABLE INFORMATION
AND IN ACCORDANCE WITH PROCEDURES ADOPTED BY THE COMPTROLLER, THE
COMPTROLLER DETERMINES THE TAX–EXEMPT STATUS SHOULD BE REINSTATED.
(G) A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION THAT HAS ITS TAX–EXEMPT STATUS
RESCINDED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY APPEAL THE RESCISSION TO THE MARYLAND
TAX COURT.
(H) THE COMPTROLLER AND DIRECTOR SHALL JOINTLY ADOPT
REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SECTION.
Article – Tax – Property
7–111.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 2–120 OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(B) IF THE DIRECTOR RECEIVES NOTICE THAT THE COMPTROLLER HAS
RESCINDED A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION’S TAX–EXEMPT STATUS IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 2–120 OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE, THE DIRECTOR SHALL RESCIND
THE NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION’S TAX–EXEMPT STATUS WITH RESPECT TO ANY
PROPERTY TAX EXEMPTION UNDER § 7–202 OR 7–204 OF THIS TITLE.
(C) THE DIRECTOR SHALL FOLLOW THE PROCEDURES SPECIFIED UNDER §
2–120 OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE FOR IMPOSING AND WITHDRAWING A
RESCISSION AND REINSTATING A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION’S TAX–EXEMPT
STATUS UNDER THIS SECTION.
(D) A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION THAT HAS ITS TAX–EXEMPT STATUS
RESCINDED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY APPEAL THE RESCISSION TO THE MARYLAND
TAX COURT.
(E) THE DIRECTOR AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL JOINTLY ADOPT
REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.